src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
! ---------------
!! The Ojibwa language nouns inflect in cases.

!Todo:
!need to implement obviation:
!   these are the facts as far as I understand them
!   animate nouns possessed by third persons must be obviative
!   obviation is consistent throughout a DP (obviative possessor has obviative possessum never proximate possessum)
!      this is somewhat redundant given the above generalization
!   inanimate nouns are not obligatorily obviative when possessed
!   it is unclear to me whether unspecified possessors trigger obviation
!   going to check with Rand
!indefinite pos cannot be inflected for number/obviation (correct?)

LEXICON N_PREFIXES 
1+:ni N_FIRST_PERSON_SET ;
2+:gi N_SECOND_PERSON_SET ;
3+:o  N_THIRD_PERSON_SET ;
X+:i  N_X_PERSON_SET ; !will need to disallow indefinite possession on alienable
        NOUNS ;
!prefix features do not currently agree with yaml

!recommend specifying animacy near stem and as inflectional feature in plurals/obviatives
!small redundancy, but spares memory and allows agreement checking if not inflected
!memory not spared, because you might not want to accept the wrong gendered plural marker (though it does happen under certain discursive contexts)

LEXICON N_FIRST_PERSON_SET 
@P.Person.1@    NOUNS ;

LEXICON N_SECOND_PERSON_SET 
@P.Person.2@    NOUNS ;

LEXICON N_THIRD_PERSON_SET 
@P.Person.3@    NOUNS ;

LEXICON N_X_PERSON_SET 
@P.Person.X@    NOUNS ;

LEXICON N_CON_DIM   
+Con:enh    N_POS_THEME_GET ;
+Dim:ens    N_POS_THEME_GET ;
            N_POS_THEME_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_THEME_GET 
!go to N_POS_THEME only if you have person
!go to N_PEJ is legit alternative
@R.Person@  N_POS_THEME ;
            N_PEJ ;

LEXICON N_POS_THEME
!optionality of +Pos instantiated in N_POS_THEME_GET
!entrance requires a person flag, person flags are not forced to enter
+ThmPos:im N_PEJ ;

LEXICON N_PEJ 
+Pej:ish    N_POS_NUM_GET ;
            N_POS_NUM_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_GET 
@D.Person.X@@D.Person.3@@R.Person@  N_POS_NUM_2_1 ;
@D.Person.X@@D.Person.1@@R.Person@  N_POS_NUM_2_3 ;
@R.Person.3@            N_POS_NUM_3 ; 
                        N_MOOD_GET ;

!optionality of possessor number instantiated in GET
!entrance requires a person flag, person flags are not forced to enter

!should there be a nomenclature for the descendants of gateways?
!a specified order?
!it seems that one could have some indentation or bracketing to indicate when a sublexicon is under a gateway
!though within a lexicon, whitespace matters (?)

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_2_1
!2 prefix may be followed by 1pl suff=1.pl.inc
+1+Pl:inaan     N_MOOD_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_2_3
!3 prefix may be followed by 2pl suff=3.pl
+2+Pl:iwaa   N_MOOD_GET ;

LEXICON N_POS_NUM_3
+3+4:ini   N_MOOD_GET ;

!style/syntax note
!the following might be intuitive, but it is wrong
!it will match a "+" followed by a multicharacter "1Pl" ... which doesn't exist
!further, to make an output, you need to cross the fsas. 
!   [a|b] .x. [c|d] -> a:c, b:d
!   [a|b] .x. [c] -> a:c, b:c
!<"+"[1Pl|21]>:inaan   N_MOOD_GET ; !yaml currently excludes second person prefix, though this is used for first person inclusive
!style on regexes for features

!style note: terminal symbols only introduced when no further morphemes can possibly follow

LEXICON N_MOOD_GET 
+Prt:iban  N_NUM_GET ;
!there are not inanimate vocative plurals (-idin)
@R.Animate.1@   NA_VOCPL ;
            N_NUM_GET ;

LEXICON NA_VOCPL !Long feat name
+Voc+Pl:idig # ; !odawa specific variant (included because we are gearing towards Nish now)
!+Voc+Pl:idog # ; !general oji variant

LEXICON N_NUM_GET 
@R.Animate.1@   NA_NUM ;
@R.Animate.%0@   NI_NUM ;
+4:an              # ;
+Loc:ing             # ;
                # ;
!intended: take one or none  of obv, loc, pl suffs, but no more
LEXICON NA_NUM 
+Pl:ag # ;

LEXICON NI_NUM 
+Pl:an # ;
